Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.910

Savings—1963 c 124.

The enactment of this chapter shall not have the effect of terminating, or in any way modifying any liability, civil or criminal, which shall already be in existence on July 1, 1963.

[ 1963 c 124 s 57.]